Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.130

Compensation and travel expenses of members.

Members of the board are entitled to receive their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Each member of the board will also be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

[ 2022 c 240 s 25; 1984 c 287 s 41; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 39; 1967 c 188 s 3; 1963 c 25 s 13.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.